Florida, session 2026, SB772.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 16 17 Section 1.âParagraph (h) of subsection (1) and subsection 18 (4) of section 626.321, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 19 626.321âLimited licenses and registration.â 20 (1)âThe department shall issue to a qualified applicant a 21 license as agent authorized to transact a limited class of 22 business in any of the following categories of limited lines 23 insurance: 24 (h)âPortable electronics or eyewear insurance.âLicense for 25 property insurance or inland marine insurance that covers only 26 loss, theft, mechanical failure, malfunction, or damage for 27 portable electronics or eyewear. Such license does not require a 28 licensee to sell or offer for sale coverage for both portable 29 electronics and eyewear. This paragraph may not be construed as 30 requiring two separate licenses to sell or offer for sale 31 portable electronics or eyewear insurance. 32 1.âThe license may be issued only to: 33 a.âEmployees or authorized representatives of a licensed 34 general lines agent; or 35 b.âThe lead business location of a retail vendor that sells 36 portable electronics or eyewear insurance. The lead business 37 location must have a contractual relationship with a general 38 lines agent. 39 2.âEmployees or authorized representatives of a licensee 40 under subparagraph 1. may sell or offer for sale portable 41 electronics or eyewear coverage without being subject to 42 licensure as an insurance agent if: 43 a.âSuch insurance is sold or offered for sale at a licensed 44 location or at one of the licenseeâs branch locations if the 45 branch location is appointed by the licensed lead business 46 location or its appointing insurers; 47 b.âThe insurer issuing the insurance directly supervises or 48 appoints a general lines agent to supervise the sale of such 49 insurance, including the development of a training program for 50 the employees and authorized representatives of vendors that are 51 directly engaged in the activity of selling or offering the 52 insurance; and 53 c.âAt each location where the insurance is offered, 54 brochures or other written materials that provide the 55 information required by this subparagraph are made available to 56 all prospective customers. The brochures or written materials 57 may include information regarding portable electronics or 58 eyewear insurance, service warranty agreements, or other 59 incidental services or benefits offered by a licensee. 60 3.âIndividuals not licensed to sell portable electronics or 61 eyewear insurance may not be paid commissions based on the sale 62 of such coverage. However, a licensee who uses a compensation 63 plan for employees and authorized representatives which includes 64 supplemental compensation for the sale of noninsurance products, 65 in addition to a regular salary or hourly wages, may include 66 incidental compensation for the sale of portable electronics or 67 eyewear insurance as a component of the overall compensation 68 plan. 69 4.âBrochures or other written materials related to portable 70 electronics or eyewear insurance must: 71 a.âDisclose that such insurance may duplicate coverage 72 already provided by a customerâs homeowners insurance policy, 73 renters insurance policy, or other source of coverage; 74 b.âState that enrollment in insurance coverage is not 75 required in order to purchase or lease portable electronics or 76 eyewear or services; 77 c.âSummarize the material terms of the insurance coverage, 78 including the identity of the insurer, the identity of the 79 supervising entity, the amount of any applicable deductible and 80 how it is to be paid, the benefits of coverage, and key terms 81 and conditions of coverage, such as whether portable electronics 82 or eyewear may be repaired or replaced with similar make and 83 model reconditioned or nonoriginal manufacturer parts or 84 equipment; 85 d.âSummarize the process for filing a claim, including a 86 description of how to return portable electronics or eyewear and 87 the maximum fee applicable if the customer fails to comply with 88 equipment return requirements; and 89 e.âState that an enrolled customer may cancel coverage at 90 any time and that the person paying the premium will receive a 91 refund of any unearned premium. 92 5.âA licensed and appointed general lines agent is not 93 required to obtain a portable electronics and eyewear insurance 94 license to offer or sell portable electronics or eyewear 95 insurance at locations already licensed as an insurance agency, 96 but may apply for a portable electronics and eyewear insurance 97 license for branch locations not otherwise licensed to sell 98 insurance. 99 6.âA portable electronics and eyewear insurance license 100 authorizes the sale of individual policies or certificates under 101 a group or master insurance policy. The license also authorizes 102 the sale of service warranty agreements covering only portable 103 electronics or eyewear to the same extent as if licensed under 104 s. 634.419 or s. 634.420. 105 7.âA licensee may bill and collect the premium for the 106 purchase of portable electronics or eyewear insurance provided 107 that: 108 a.âIf the insurance is included with the purchase or lease 109 of portable electronics or eyewear or related services, the 110 licensee clearly and conspicuously discloses that insurance 111 coverage is included with the purchase. Disclosure of the stand 112 alone cost of the premium for same or similar insurance must be 113 made on the customerâs bill and in any marketing materials made 114 available at the point of sale. If the insurance is not 115 included, the charge to the customer for the insurance must be 116 separately itemized on the customerâs bill. 117 b.âPremiums are incidental to other fees collected, are 118 maintained in a manner that is readily identifiable, and are 119 accounted for and remitted to the insurer or supervising entity 120 within 60 days of receipt. Licensees are not required to 121 maintain such funds in a segregated account. 122 c.âAll funds received by a licensee from an enrolled 123 customer for the sale of the insurance are considered funds held 124 in trust by the licensee in a fiduciary capacity for the benefit 125 of the insurer. Licensees may receive compensation for billing 126 and collection services. 127 8.âNotwithstanding any other provision of law, the terms 128 for the termination or modification of coverage under a policy 129 of portable electronics or eyewear insurance are those set forth 130 in the policy. 131 9.âNotice or correspondence required by the policy, or 132 otherwise required by law, may be provided by electronic means 133 if the insurer or licensee maintains proof that the notice or 134 correspondence was sent. Such notice or correspondence may be 135 sent on behalf of the insurer or licensee by the general lines 136 agent appointed by the insurer to supervise the administration 137 of the program. For purposes of this subparagraph, an enrolled 138 customerâs provision of an electronic mail address to the 139 insurer or licensee is deemed to be consent to receive notices 140 and correspondence by electronic means if a conspicuously 141 located disclosure is provided to the customer indicating the 142 same. 143 10.âThe fingerprinting requirements in s. 626.171(4) do not 144 apply to licenses issued to qualified entities under this 145 paragraph. 146 11.âA branch location that sells portable electronics or 147 eyewear insurance may, in lieu of obtaining an appointment from 148 an insurer or warranty association, obtain a single appointment 149 from the associated lead business location licensee and pay the 150 prescribed appointment fee under s. 624.501 if the lead business 151 location has a single appointment from each insurer or warranty 152 association represented and such appointment applies to the lead 153 business location and all of its branch locations. Branch 154 location appointments shall be renewed 24 months after the 155 initial appointment date of the lead business location and every 156 24 months thereafter. Notwithstanding s. 624.501, the renewal 157 fee applicable to such branch location appointments is $30 per 158 appointment. 159 12.âFor purposes of this paragraph: 160 a.ââBranch locationâ means any physical location in this 161 state at which a licensee offers its products or services for 162 sale. 163 b.ââEyewearâ means smart glasses and nonelectronic eyewear. 164 As used in this sub-subparagraph, the term ânonelectronic 165 eyewearâ includes prescription and nonprescription eyeglasses 166 and sunglasses. 167 c.b.ââPortable electronicsâ means equipment that is 168 personal, self-contained, easily carried, by an individual; has 169 electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, electromagnetic, or 170 similar capabilities; and operates using batteries, rechargeable 171 power sources, or other energy sources. The term includes 172 equipment used for communication; data processing; viewing; 173 listening; recording; gaming; computing; navigation; household, 174 health or activity monitoring; or similar uses and may also 175 incorporate features responsive to user input or environmental 176 conditions personal, self-contained, easily carried by an 177 individual, battery-operated electronic communication, viewing, 178 listening, recording, gaming, computing or global positioning 179 devices, including cell or satellite phones, pagers, personal 180 global positioning satellite units, portable computers, portable 181 audio listening, video viewing or recording devices, digital 182 cameras, video camcorders, portable gaming systems, docking 183 stations, automatic answering devices, and other similar devices 184 and their accessories, and service related to the use of such 185 devices. 186 c.ââPortable electronics transactionâ means the sale or 187 lease of portable electronics or a related service, including 188 portable electronics insurance. 189 (4)âExcept as otherwise expressly provided, a person 190 applying for or holding a limited license is subject to the same 191 applicable requirements and responsibilities that apply to 192 general lines agents in general if licensed as to motor vehicle 193 physical damage and mechanical breakdown insurance, industrial 194 fire insurance or burglary insurance, motor vehicle rental 195 insurance, credit insurance, crop hail and multiple-peril crop 196 insurance, in-transit and storage personal property insurance, 197 or portable electronics or eyewear insurance; or as apply to 198 life agents or health agents in general, as applicable, if 199 licensed as to travel insurance. 200 Section 2.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 201 626.221, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 202 626.221âExamination requirement; exemptions.â 203 (2)âHowever, an examination is not necessary for any of the 204 following: 205 (b)âAn applicant for a limited license as agent for travel 206 insurance, motor vehicle rental insurance, credit insurance, in 207 transit and storage personal property insurance, or portable 208 electronics or eyewear insurance under s. 626.321. 209 Section 3.âSubsection (7) of section 626.732, Florida 210 Statutes, is amended to read: 211 626.732âRequirement as to knowledge, experience, or 212 instruction.â 213 (7)âThis section does not apply to an individual holding 214 only a limited license for travel insurance, motor vehicle 215 rental insurance, credit insurance, in-transit and storage 216 personal property insurance, or portable electronics or eyewear 217 insurance. 218 Section 4.âSection 626.8685, Florida Statutes, is amended 219 to read: 220 626.8685âPortable electronics or eyewear insurance claims; 221 exemption; licensure restriction.â 222 (1)âThis part does not apply to any individual who collects 223 claims information from, or furnishes claims information to, 224 insureds or claimants, and who conducts data entry, including 225 entering data into an automated claims adjudication system, 226 provided that the individual is an employee of a business entity 227 licensed under this chapter, or its affiliate, and no more than 228 25 such persons are under the supervision of one licensed 229 independent adjuster or licensed agent who is exempt from 230 licensure pursuant to s. 626.862. For purposes of this 231 subsection, the term âautomated claims adjudication systemâ 232 means a preprogrammed computer system designed for the 233 collection, data entry, calculation, and final resolution of 234 portable electronics or eyewear insurance claims that: 235 (a)âMay be used only by a licensed independent adjuster, 236 licensed agent, or supervised individual operating pursuant to 237 this subsection; 238 (b)âMust comply with all claims payment requirements of the 239 insurance code; and 240 (c)âMust be certified as compliant with this subsection by 241 a licensed independent adjuster that is an officer of a licensed 242 business entity under this chapter. 243 (2)âNotwithstanding any other provision of law, a resident 244 of Canada may not be licensed as a nonresident independent 245 adjuster for purposes of adjusting portable electronics 246 insurance or eyewear claims unless the person has successfully 247 obtained an adjusterâs license in another state. 248 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.